Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
ORDINANCE CODES ADOPTED BY REFERENCE

31-16-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adopting municipality" means any municipality which has adopted or is in the process of adopting an ordinance pursuant to the provisions of this part 2.

"Code" means any published compilation of statutes, ordinances, rules, regulations, or standards adopted by the federal government or the state of Colorado, by an agency of either of them, or by any municipality or other political subdivision in this state. The term includes any codification or compilation of existing ordinances of the adopting municipality. The term "code" also means published compilations of any nongovernmental organization or institution which may embrace any of the following subjects: The construction, alteration, repair, removal, demolition, equipment, use, occupancy, location, maintenance, or other matters related to buildings or other erected structures including, but not limited to, building codes, fire or fire prevention codes, plumbing codes, housing codes, mechanical codes, and electrical codes.

"Municipality" means any city or any town operating under general or special laws of the state of Colorado or any home rule city or town, the charter or ordinances of which contain no provisions inconsistent with provisions of this part 2.

"Primary code" means any code which is directly adopted by reference in whole or in part by any ordinance passed pursuant to this part 2.

"Published" means issued in printed, lithographed, multigraphed, mimeographed, or similar form.

"Secondary code" means any code which is incorporated by reference, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part in any primary code or in any secondary code.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1125, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-401 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-202. Adoption by reference - title.

If all the procedures and requirements of this part 2 are complied with, any municipality may enact any ordinance which adopts any code by reference in whole or in part, and such primary code thus adopted may in turn adopt by reference, in whole or in part, any secondary codes duly described therein. However, every primary code which is incorporated in any such adopting ordinance shall be specified in the title of the ordinance. Notwithstanding the procedures and requirements of this part 2, a municipality may enact any ordinance which adopts by reference any statute, rule, regulation, or standard adopted by the federal government or the state of Colorado, or by any agency of either of them, solely by referring to such statute, rule, regulation, or standard in the text of such ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1125, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1125, § 7, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-203. Notice - hearing.

After the introduction of the adopting ordinance, the governing body of any municipality shall schedule a public hearing thereon. Notice of the hearing shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the adopting municipality, once at least fifteen days preceding the hearing, and once at least eight days preceding it. If there is no such newspaper, the notice shall be posted in the same manner as provided for the posting of a proposed ordinance. The notice shall state the time and place of the hearing. It shall also state that copies of the primary code and copies of the secondary codes, if any, being considered for adoption are on file with the clerk and are open to public inspection. The notice shall also contain a description which the governing body deems sufficient to give notice to interested persons of the purpose of the primary code, the subject matter of the code, the name and address of the agency by which it has been promulgated or, if a municipality, the corporate name of such municipality which has enacted such code, and the date of publication of such code, and, in the case of a code of any municipality, the notice shall contain a specific reference to the code of a given municipality as it existed and was effective at a given date. The requirements as to the reading of the adopting ordinance are as provided in section 31-16-107.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1125, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-204. Adopting ordinance - adoption of penalty clauses by reference prohibited.

After the hearing, the governing body may amend, adopt, or reject the adopting ordinance in the same manner in which it is empowered to act in the case of other ordinances; but nothing in this part 2 shall permit the adoption by reference of any penalty clauses which may appear in any code which is adopted by reference. Any such penalty clauses may be enacted only if set forth in full and published in the adopting ordinance. All changes or additions to any code made by the governing body shall be published in the manner which is required for ordinances; except that changes or additions which are not substantive in nature made in connection with any codification or compilation of existing ordinances of the adopting municipality may be posted at the municipal offices in lieu of publication of such changes or additions.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1126, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1126, § 8, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-205. Publication of ordinance.

Nothing in this part 2 shall relieve any municipality from the requirement of publishing in full the ordinance which adopts any such code, and all provisions applicable to such publication shall be fully carried out. The adopting ordinance shall contain the same description of the primary adopted code as required in the notice of hearing in section 31-16-203.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1126, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-405 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-206. Filing of public record - sale of copies.

Not less than one copy of each primary code adopted by reference and of each secondary code pertaining thereto, all certified to be true copies by the mayor and the clerk, shall be filed in the office of the clerk at least fifteen days preceding the hearing and shall be kept there for public inspection while the ordinance is in force. After the adoption of the code by reference, a copy of the primary code and of each secondary code may be kept in the office of the chief enforcement officer instead of in the office of the clerk. Following the adoption of any code, the clerk shall at all times maintain a reasonable supply of copies of the primary code available for purchase by the public at a moderate price.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1126, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 1126, § 9, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-406 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-207. Amendments.

If at any time any code which any municipality has previously adopted by reference is amended by the agency or municipality which originally promulgated, adopted, or enacted it, the governing body may adopt such amendment by reference through the same procedure as required for the adoption of the original code, or an ordinance may be enacted in the regular manner setting forth the entire text of such amendment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1126, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-407 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-208. Use as evidence.

Copies of such codes in published form, duly certified by the clerk and mayor of the municipality, shall be received without further proof as prima facie evidence of the provisions of such codes or public records in all courts and administrative tribunals of this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1127, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-408 as it existed prior to 1975.